District of Columbia statutes.
47-1809.03

Tax on estates and trusts — Imposition.

The taxes imposed by §§ 47-1806.01 to 47-1806.06 upon residents shall apply to the income of resident estates, and income from any kind of property held in resident trusts, including:

(1)

Income accumulated in trust for the benefit of unborn or unascertained person or persons with contingent interests, and income accumulated or held for future distribution under the terms of the will or trust;

(2)

Income which is to be distributed currently by the fiduciary to the beneficiaries, and income collected by a guardian of any infant or incompetent person which is to be held or distributed as the court may direct;

(3)

Income received by estates of deceased persons during the period of administration or settlement of the estate; and

(4)

Income which, in the discretion of the fiduciary, may be either distributed to the beneficiaries or accumulated.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 347, ch. 258, art. I, title IX, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-1577b.
1981 Ed., § 47-1809.3.
Tax rate changes, authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, see § 47-504.